Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5776.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-12 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Turnpike and
Bridge Authority" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-12-60. Safety barrier on bridges.
(a) The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority (RITBA) is hereby directed to design
a safety barrier and/or safety netting on the Mount Hope Bridge, the Claiborne Pell Bridge, and the
Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge (the “bridges”). The process shall be implemented as follows:
(1) RITBA shall submit the design of the safety barrier and/or safety netting for the bridges
to the house finance committee and the senate finance committee on or before January 1, 2026.
(2) RITBA shall issue a request for proposals for the safety barrier and/or safety netting on
or before April 30, 2026.
(3) Proposals shall be reviewed and accepted by RITBA, and construction and installation
of the safety barrier and/or safety netting shall commence on the bridges, no later than August 1,
2026.
(b) Any newly constructed bridges within the state with a deck height of over one hundred
feet (100′) shall be required to have safety barriers or safety netting.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002084
========